Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4904.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 18114. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the The department may grant relicensure as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed counselor to an individual who is applying for relicensure less than 3 years after the expiration date of his or her the individual's license, if the individual submits complies with both of the following: (a) Submits to the department a completed application on a form provided by the department together with payment of the fees described in section 16201(3). , and he or she complies with both of the following: (a) Submits with his or her application a professional disclosure statement that meets the requirements of section 18113. (b) If the individual holds or has held a license as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed counselor in another state, ensures that the licensing agency of each out-of-state license verifies all of the following on a form provided by the department: (i) That disciplinary proceedings are not pending against the individual at the time of his or her the individual's application for relicensure. (ii) That if sanctions have been imposed against the individual, the sanctions are not in force at the time of his or her the individual's application for relicensure. (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the The department may grant relicensure as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed counselor to an individual who is applying for relicensure more than 3 years after the expiration date of his or her the individual's license, if the individual submits to the department a completed application on a form provided by the department together with payment of the fees described in section 16201(4), and a professional disclosure statement that meets the requirements of section 18113, and he or she the individual complies with 1 of the following: (a) Takes or retakes and passes 1 of the following: (i) The national counselor examination developed by the National Board for Certified Counselors. (ii) The certification examination given by the Commission on Rehabilitation Counselor Certification. (iii) An examination that the department determines is equivalent to an examination described in subparagraph (i) or (ii). (b) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that he or she the individual meets the requirements for certification issued by the National Board for Certified Counselors, the Commission on Rehabilitation Counselor Certification, or an equivalent program as determined by the department. (3) The department may grant relicensure as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed counselor to an individual who received a master's or doctoral degree in counseling or student personnel work before October 1, 1991, and completed 2 years of professional experience before October 1, 1993, if the individual submits to the department a completed application on a form provided by the department together with payment of the applicable fees described in section 16201(3) or (4) and he or she complies with 1 of the following: (a) Submits with his or her application a professional disclosure statement that meets the requirements of section 18113. (b) If the individual holds or has held a license as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed counselor in another state, ensures that the licensing agency of each out-of-state license verifies all of the following on a form provided by the department: (i) That disciplinary proceedings are not pending against the individual at the time of his or her application for relicensure. (ii) That if sanctions have been imposed against the individual, the sanctions are not in force at the time of his or her application for relicensure. Enacting section 1. Section 18113 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18113, is repealed.